Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-269
Instrument recorded more than fifteen years without contest; validity.

After one year from July 24, 1917, no action shall be maintained whereby to set aside, cancel, annul, declare void or invalid any deed of conveyance, mortgage, release of mortgage, or other instrument affecting the title to any real estate, which has been recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county or counties in this state in which such real estate is situated for more than fifteen years prior to the commencement of such action, and purporting to be executed by any executor, administrator, guardian, receiver or trustee, notwithstanding any defect in, or absence of, any record of the court granting authority to such executor, administrator, guardian, receiver or trustee to execute the same. Unless such deed of conveyance, mortgage, release of mortgage or other instrument shall have been modified or set aside by an action or proceeding commenced within one year after said date or within fifteen years from the date of recording thereof, it shall be conclusively presumed that such executor, administrator, guardian, receiver or trustee had due authority to execute the same, notwithstanding such defect in, or absence of, any record of such court. This section shall not release any such executor, administrator, guardian, receiver or trustee from any liability or responsibility to which he is subject.

Laws 1917, c. 223, § 8, p. 549;

C.S.1922, § 5661;

Laws 1923, c. 101, § 1, p. 256;

C.S.1929, § 76-267;

Laws 1935, c. 149, § 1, p. 553;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-267;

R.S.1943, § 76-269.